incubator/apertium-pes/dev/apertium-far.far.dix
	<pardef n="mokasar__n">
		<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>م</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l><b/>من</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l>ام</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یم</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		
		<e><p><l>ت</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l><b/>تو</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ات</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>یت</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		
		<e><p><l>ش</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l><b/>او</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>اش</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>یش</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		
		<e><p><l>مان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l><b/>ما</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>یمان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
		
		<e><p><l>تان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
	 	<e><p><l><b/>شما</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>یتان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e><p><l>شان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
	 	<e><p><l><b/>آن‌ها</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>یشان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>	
	
	<pardef n="sefat__n">
	    <e><p><l/><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
	     <!--<e><p><l>ها</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>ان</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ات</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>ین</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>-->
	  <!--<e><p><l>ه</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="enc"/><s n="rel"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>-->
	 <e><p><l>ی</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	 <e><p><l>ند</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="enc"/><s n="rel"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>تر</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l>ترین</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l>تره</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="enc"/><s n="rel"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l>ترند</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="enc"/><s n="rel"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l>ترینه</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="enc"/><s n="rel"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l>ترینند</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="enc"/><s n="rel"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	
	   <e><p><l>م</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l><b/>من</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l>ام</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
         <e><p><l><b/>ام</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>یم</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		
		<e><p><l>ت</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l><b/>تو</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ات</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l><b/>ات</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>یت</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		
		<e><p><l>ش</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l><b/>او</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>اش</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l><b/>اش</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>یش</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
		
		<e><p><l>مان</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l><b/>ما</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>یمان</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
		
		<e><p><l>تان</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
	 	<e><p><l><b/>شما</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>یتان</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e><p><l>شان</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
	 	<e><p><l><b/>آن‌ها</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>یشان</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	
	<pardef n="gheyd__n">
	    <e><p><l/><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l>تر</l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	
	<pardef n="harfeezafe__n">
	   <e><p><l/><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>م</l><r><s n="pr"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>ت</l><r><s n="pr"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>ش</l><r><s n="pr"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>ش</l><r><s n="pr"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>مان</l><r><s n="pr"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>تان</l><r><s n="pr"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>شان</l><r><s n="pr"/><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="harfeneda__n">
	    <e><p><l/><r><s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	
	<pardef n="harferel__n">
	    <e><p><l/><r><s n="rel"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	
	<pardef n="zamir__n">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="zamirrel__n">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="zamirra__n">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="zamireenekasi__n">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="zamireenekasiavalmofrad__n">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	

	<e lm="که"><i>که</i><par n="harferel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="دروس"><p><l>دروس</l><r>درس</r></p><par n="mokasar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="الیاف"><p><l>الیاف</l><r>لیف</r></p><par n="mokasar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="اجزا"><p><l>اجزا</l><r>جزء</r></p><par n="mokasar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="وظایف"><p><l>وظایف</l><r>وظیفه</r></p><par n="mokasar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="غنائم"><p><l>غنائم</l><r>غنیمت</r></p><par n="mokasar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ایام"><p><l>ایام</l><r>یوم</r></p><par n="mokasar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="دلایل"><p><l>دلایل</l><r>دلیل</r></p><par n="mokasar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="افکار"><p><l>افکار</l><r>فکر</r></p><par n="mokasar__n"/></e>
	<e lm="صور"><p><l>صور</l><r>صورت</r></p><par n="mokasar__n"/></e>
	<e lm="حضار"><p><l>حضار</l><r>حاضر</r></p><par n="mokasar__n"/></e>
	<e lm="وجوب"><p><l>وجوب</l><r>واجب</r></p><par n="mokasar__n"/></e>
	<e lm="عشاق"><p><l>عشاق</l><r>عاشق</r></p><par n="mokasar__n"/></e>
	<e lm="جرائم"><p><l>جرائم</l><r>جرم</r></p><par n="mokasar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="نکات"><p><l>نکات</l><r>نکته</r></p><par n="mokasar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="تجربیات"><p><l>تجربیات</l><r>تجربه</r></p><par n="mokasar__n"/></e>
	<e lm="خوش‌بخت"><i>خوش‌بخت</i><par n="sefat__n"/></e>
	<e lm="متناسب"><i>متناسب</i><par n="sefat__n"/></e>
	<e lm="جوانان"><i>جوانان</i><par n="sefat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="عربی"><i>عربی</i><par n="sefat__n"/></e>
	<e lm="سفید"><i>سفید</i><par n="sefat__n"/></e>
	<e lm="مقدم"><i>مقدم</i><par n="sefat__n"/></e>
	<e lm="زبردست"><i>زبردست</i><par n="sefat__n"/></e>
	<e lm="اول"><i>اول</i><par n="sefat__n"/></e>
	<e lm="بلور"><i>بلور</i><par n="sefat__n"/></e>
	<e lm="خشن"><i>خشن</i><par n="sefat__n"/></e>
	<e lm="مبهم"><i>مبهم</i><par n="sefat__n"/></e>
	<e lm="برنده"><i>برنده</i><par n="sefat__n"/></e>
	<e lm="دیر"><i>دیر</i><par n="sefat__n"/></e>
	<e lm="شهوتی"><i>شهوتی</i><par n="sefat__n"/></e>
	<e lm="دور"><i>دور</i><par n="sefat__n"/></e>
<e lm="ها"><i>ها</i><par n="gheyd__n"/></e>
	<e lm="امّا"><i>امّا</i><par n="gheyd__n"/></e>
	<e lm="در قبال"><i>در<b/>قبال</i><par n="harfeezafe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="البته"><i>البته</i><par n="gheyd__n"/></e>
	<e lm="اتفاقا"><i>اتفاقا</i><par n="gheyd__n"/></e>
	<e lm="صحیح"><i>صحیح</i><par n="gheyd__n"/></e>
	<e lm="هم‌جوار"><i>هم‌جوار</i><par n="gheyd__n"/></e>
	<e lm="خوانا"><i>خوانا</i><par n="gheyd__n"/></e>
	<e lm="خمیده"><i>خمیده</i><par n="gheyd__n"/></e>
	<e lm="سازنده"><i>سازنده</i><par n="gheyd__n"/></e>
	<e lm="مبهم"><i>مبهم</i><par n="gheyd__n"/></e>
	<e lm="برنده"><i>برنده</i><par n="gheyd__n"/></e>
	<e lm="عاشقانه"><i>عاشقانه</i><par n="gheyd__n"/></e>
	<e lm="پرهیاهو"><i>پرهیاهو</i><par n="gheyd__n"/></e>
	<e lm="انزواگرایانه"><i>انزواگرایانه</i><par n="gheyd__n"/></e>
      <e lm="همیشه"><i>همیشه</i><par n="gheyd__n"/></e>
	 <e lm="بله"><i>بله</i><par n="harfeneda__n"/></e>
    <e lm="خیر"><i>خیر</i><par n="harfeneda__n"/></e>
	 <e lm="به داخل"><i>به<b/>داخل</i><par n="harfeezafe__n"/></e>
	<e lm="پیش"><i>پیش</i><par n="harfeezafe__n"/></e>
		<e lm="اطراف"><i>اطراف</i><par n="harfeezafe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="در"><i>در</i><par n="harfeezafe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="روی"><i>روی</i><par n="harfeezafe__n"/></e>
	<e lm="به"><i>به</i><par n="harfeezafe__n"/></e>
	<e lm="سوی"><i>سوی</i><par n="harfeezafe__n"/></e>
	<e lm="در آن سوی"><i>در<b/>آن<b/>سوی</i><par n="harfeezafe__n"/></e>
	<e lm="از طرف"><i>از<b/>طرف</i><par n="harfeezafe__n"/></e>
	<e lm="از"><i>از</i><par n="harfeezafe__n"/></e>
	<e lm="با"><i>با</i><par n="harfeezafe__n"/></e>
	<e lm="بر"><i>بر</i><par n="harfeezafe__n"/></e>
   	<e lm="پس از"><i>پس<b/>از</i><par n="harfeezafe__n"/></e>
	<e lm="ای"><i>ای</i><par n="harfeneda__n"/></e>
    <e lm="یا"><i>یا</i><par n="harfeneda__n"/></e>
	<e lm="خود"><i>خود</i><par n="zamir__n"/></e>
	<e lm="مرا"><i>مرا</i><par n="zamirra__n"/></e>
	<e lm="چی"><i>چی</i><par n="zamir__n"/></e>
	<e lm="که"><i>که</i><par n="zamir__n"/></e>
		<e lm="که"><i>که</i><par n="zamirrel__n"/></e>
	<e lm="چی"><i>چی</i><par n="zamir__n"/></e>
	<e lm="کدام"><i>کدام</i><par n="zamir__n"/></e>
	<e lm="خود"><i>خود</i><par n="zamireenekasi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="خودم"><i>خودم</i><par n="zamireenekasiavalmofrad__n"/></e>
